Montana, session 2025, HB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Conduct of judges and judicial candidates. (1) A judge or a judicial
candidate may:
(a) attend or purchase tickets for dinners or other events sponsored by a partisan or independent
candidate for nonjudicial public office; and
(b) seek, accept, or use endorsements from a political organization or a partisan or independent
nonjudicial officeholder or candidate.
(2) If allowed by law to campaign with a party designation, a judge or a judicial candidate may:
(a) act as a leader in or hold an office in a political organization;
(b)(A) make speeches on behalf of a political organization or any partisan or independent nonjudicial
officeholder or candidate for public office;
(c)(B) publicly endorse or oppose a partisan or independent candidate for any nonjudicial public
office;
(d)(C) solicit funds for, pay an assessment to, or make a contribution to a political organization or to or
on behalf of any partisan or independent officeholder or candidate for public office; and
(e)(D) publicly self-identify as a candidate of a political organization.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 3, chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. IF A PART OF [THIS ACT] IS INVALID, ALL VALID PARTS THAT ARE
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 169

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0169.2
SEVERABLE FROM THE INVALID PART REMAIN IN EFFECT. IF A PART OF [THIS ACT] IS INVALID IN ONE OR MORE OF ITS
APPLICATIONS, THE PART REMAINS IN EFFECT IN ALL VALID APPLICATIONS THAT ARE SEVERABLE FROM THE INVALID
APPLICATIONS.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 169